Utah statutes.
63G-6a-1503.   Selection committee for architect-engineer services.

(1)  In the procurement of architect-engineer services, the procurement officer or the head of an issuing procurement unit shall encourage firms engaged in the lawful practice of their profession to submit annually a statement of qualifications and performance data.

(2)  The Building Board shall be the evaluation committee for architect-engineer services contracts under its authority.

(3)  An evaluation committee for architect-engineer services contracts not under the authority of the Building Board shall be established in accordance with rules made by the applicable rulemaking authority.

(4)  An evaluation committee shall:

(a)  evaluate current statements of qualifications and performance data on file with the state, together with those that may be submitted by other firms in response to the announcement of the proposed contract;

(b)  consider no less than three firms; and

(c)  based upon criteria established and published by the issuing procurement unit, select no less than three of the firms considered to be the most highly qualified to provide the services required.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

